District of Columbia statutes.
38-174

Chancellor; appointment; duties.

(a)

The DCPS shall be administered by a Chancellor, who shall be appointed pursuant to § 1-523.01(a), and in accordance with subsection (b) of this section. The Chancellor shall:

(1)

Be the chief executive officer of DCPS;

(2)

Be qualified by experience and training for the position; and

(3)

Serve at the pleasure of the Mayor.

(b)

(1)

Prior to the selection of a nominee for Chancellor, the Mayor shall:

(A)

Establish a review panel of teachers, including representatives of the Washington Teachers Union, parents, and students (“panel”) to aid the Mayor in his or her selection of Chancellor;

(B)

Provide the resumes and other pertinent information pertaining to the individuals under consideration, if any, to the panel; and

(C)

Convene a meeting of the panel to hear the opinions and recommendations of the panel.

(2)

The Mayor shall consider the opinions and recommendations of the panel in making his or her nomination and shall give great weight to any recommendation of the Washington Teachers Union.

(c)

The duties of the Chancellor shall include to:

(1)

Organize the agency for efficient operation;

(2)

Create offices within the agency, as necessary;

(3)

Exercise the powers necessary and appropriate to operate the schools and school system and to implement applicable provisions of District and federal law;

(4)

Communicate with the collective bargaining unit for the employees under his or her administration;

(5)

Promulgate and implement rules and regulations necessary and appropriate to accomplish his or her duties and functions in accordance with § 38-172 and Chapter 5 of Title 2; [§ 2-501 et seq.];

(6)

Obtain parental input as required by the No Child Left Behind Act of 2001, approved January 8, 2002 (Pub. L. No. 107-110; 115 Stat. 1425), and in accordance with the rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter;

(7)

Hold public meetings, at least quarterly;

(8)

Exercise, to the extent that such authority is delegated by the Mayor,:

(A)

Personnel authority; and

(B)

Procurement authority independent of the Office of Contracting and Procurement, consistent with Unit A of Chapter 3 of Title 2 [§ 2-301.01 et seq.];

(9)

Maintain clean and safe school facilities; and

(10)

Create and operate a District-wide database that records the condition of all school facilities under the control of DCPS, which database shall be updated as necessary, but at least once per calendar year.

June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 105, 54 DCR 4102
Revised Delegation of Authority to Chancellor, District of Columbia Public Schools, see Mayor’s Order 2007-11622, August 10, 2007
Delegation of Authority—Chancellor, District of Columbia Public Schools, see Mayor’s Order 2007-158, July 5, 2007 ( 54 DCR 9617).
This section is referenced in § 38-755.02, § 38-781.01, and § 38-781.06.